src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection
!  ---------------
!! The Gothic language nouns inflect in cases.


LEXICON dag/s__N
!Msc http://lexicon.ff.cuni.cz/html/goth_wright/b0085.html
! a-stem
+Sg+Nom:s     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:ōs    #   ;
+Sg+Acc:0     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:ans   #   ;
+Sg+Gen:is    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:ē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:a     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:am    #   ;

LEXICON wair/__N
!Msc http://lexicon.ff.cuni.cz/html/goth_wright/b0085.html
! a-stem
+Sg+Nom:0     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:ōs    #   ;
+Sg+Acc:0     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:ans   #   ;
+Sg+Gen:is    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:ē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:a     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:am    #   ;

LEXICON hlai/fs__N ! hlaifs:hlaib
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Msc a-stem
+Sg+Nom:fs     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:bōs    #   ;
+Sg+Acc:f     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:bans   #   ;
+Sg+Gen:bis    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:bē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:ba     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:bam    #   ;

LEXICON har/jis__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Msc ja-stem 
+Sg+Nom:jis     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:jōs    #   ;
+Sg+Acc:i     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:jans   #   ;
+Sg+Gen:jis    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:jē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:ja     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:jam    #   ;

LEXICON haird/eis__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Msc ja-stem 
+Sg+Nom:eis     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:jōs    #   ;
+Sg+Acc:i     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:jans   #   ;
+Sg+Gen:eis    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:jē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:ja     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:jam    #   ;

LEXICON thi/us__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Msc wa-stem 
+Sg+Nom:us     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:wōs    #   ;
+Sg+Acc:u     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:wans   #   ;
+Sg+Gen:wis    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:wē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:wa     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:wam    #   ;


LEXICON waúrd__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
! a-stem
+Sg+Nom:0     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:a     #   ;
+Sg+Acc:0     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:a     #   ;
+Sg+Gen:is    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:ē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:a     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:am    #   ;

LEXICON wito/th__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
! a-stem
+Sg+Nom:þ     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:da     #   ;
+Sg+Acc:þ     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:da     #   ;
+Sg+Gen:dis    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:dē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:da     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:dam    #   ;

LEXICON kun/i__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
! ja-stem
+Sg+Nom:i     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:ja     #   ;
+Sg+Acc:i     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:ja     #   ;
+Sg+Gen:jis    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:jē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:ja     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:jam    #   ;

LEXICON kni/u__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Neu wa-stem
+Sg+Nom:u     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:wa     #   ;
+Sg+Acc:u     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:wa     #   ;
+Sg+Gen:wis    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:wē    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:wa     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:wam    #   ;

LEXICON gib/a__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Fem ō-stem
+Sg+Nom:a     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:ōs     #   ;
+Sg+Acc:a     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:ōs     #   ;
+Sg+Gen:ōs    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:ō    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:ái     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:ōm    #   ;

LEXICON band/i__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Fem jō-stem
+Sg+Nom:i     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:jōs     #   ;
+Sg+Acc:ja     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:jōs     #   ;
+Sg+Gen:jōs    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:jō    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:jái     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:jōm    #   ;

LEXICON ma/wi__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Fem jō-stem
+Sg+Nom:awi     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:áujōs     #   ;
+Sg+Acc:áuja     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:áujōs     #   ;
+Sg+Gen:áujōs    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:áujō    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:áujái     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:áujōm    #   ;

LEXICON tryggw/a__N
!https://lrc.la.utexas.edu/eieol/gotol/10
!Fem wō-stem
+Sg+Nom:a     #   ;
+Pl+Nom:ōs     #   ;
+Sg+Acc:a     #   ;
+Pl+Acc:ōs     #   ;
+Sg+Gen:ōs    #   ;
+Pl+Gen:ō    #   ;
+Sg+Dat:ái     #   ;
+Pl+Dat:ōm    #   ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
