src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
!  -----
!! Nouns in the Gothic language are things.

LEXICON Nouns

dags+N:dag    dag/s__N "day"  ;
waír+N:waír    wair/__N "man"  ;
baúr+N:baúr    wair/__N "son"  ;
hláifs+N:hlái    hlai/fs__N "bread"  ;
harjis+N:har har/jis__N "army" ;
haírdeis+N:haírd haird/eis__N "army" ;
þius+N:þi thi/uis__N "army" ;

háubiþ+N:háubiþ  waúrd__N "head" ;
waúrd+N:waúrd  waúrd__N "word" ;
witōþ+N:witō  wito/th__N "law" ;
kuni+N:kun kun/i__N "race" ;
reiki+N:reik kun/i__N "kingdom" ;
kniu+N:kni kni/u__N "knee" ;

giba+N:gib gib/a__N "gift" ;
sunja+N:sunj gib/a__N "truth" ;

bandi+N:band band/i__N "band, bond" ;
mawi+N:m m/awi__N "maiden" ;

triggwa+N:triggw triggw/a__N "covenant" ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
